Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2402
Terms, defined.

For the purposes of sections 25-2401 to 25-2407 unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Deaf or hard of hearing person means a person whose hearing impairment, with or without amplification, is so severe that he or she may have difficulty in auditorily processing spoken language without the use of an interpreter or a person with a fluctuating or permanent hearing loss which may adversely affect the ability to understand spoken language without the use of an interpreter or other auxiliary aid;

(2) Person unable to communicate the English language means a person who cannot readily understand or communicate the English language; and

(3) Proceeding means any legal proceeding or any hearing preliminary thereto involving persons unable to communicate the English language or deaf or hard of hearing persons unable to communicate by a spoken language.

Laws 1973, LB 116, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 376, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 851, § 11;

Laws 2002, LB 22, § 9.